Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2142
Seizure or sequestration of voting securities.

In any case when a person has acquired or is proposing to acquire any voting securities in violation of the Insurance Holding Company System Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the director, the district court of Lancaster County may, on such notice as the court deems appropriate, upon the application of the insurer or the director seize or sequester any voting securities of the insurer owned directly or indirectly by such person and issue such order with respect thereto as may be appropriate to effectuate the act. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for purposes of the act the sites of the ownership of the securities of domestic insurers shall be deemed to be in this state.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 22.